Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7073.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 23-96-2 and 23-96-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-96 entitled
"Prohibited Release of Balloons" are hereby amended to read as follows:
23-96-2. Penalties.
(a) Any person or entity who violates this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of one
hundred dollars ($100) for a first offense and up to two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for a second
or subsequent offense.
(b) The department of environmental management, in conjunction with state and local law
enforcement, shall have jurisdiction and shall coordinate regarding the enforcement of the
provisions of this chapter.
23-96-3. Regulations.
The department of environmental management (the "department") shall promulgate rules
and regulations as may be necessary to implement and carry out enforce the provisions of this
chapter. The department may also pursue grants to create a public information campaign to inform
the public of the provisions of this chapter and the hazards and damages that may stem from the
release of balloons in violation of this chapter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003923
========